North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-41.2.
Powers of Board of Governors generally.

In addition to the powers which the Board now has, the Board shall have the following powers subject to the provisions of this Part and subject to agreements with the holders of any revenue bonds issued hereunder:

To acquire by gift, purchase or the exercise of the power of eminent domain or to construct, provide, improve, maintain and operate any project or projects;

To borrow money for the construction of any project or projects, and to issue revenue bonds therefor in the name of the University;

To establish, maintain, revise, charge and collect such service charges (free of any control or regulation by any State regulatory body until January 1, 1973, and thereafter only by the North Carolina Utilities Commission) as will produce sufficient revenues to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds and otherwise to meet the requirements of the resolution or resolutions of the Board authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds;

To pledge to the payment of any bonds of the University issued hereunder and the interest thereon the revenues of the project financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds, and to pledge to the payment of such bonds and interest any other revenues, subject to any prior pledge or encumbrance thereof;

To appropriate, apply, or expend in payment of the cost of the project the proceeds of the revenue bonds issued for the project;

To sell, furnish, distribute, rent, or permit, as the case may be, the use, occupancy, services, facilities and commodities of or furnished by any project or any system, facility, plant, works, instrumentalities or properties whose revenues are pledged in whole or in part for the payment of the bonds, and to sell, exchange, transfer, assign or otherwise dispose of any project or any of the University Enterprises or any other service or auxiliary facility or any part of any thereof or interest therein determined by resolution of the Board not to be required for any public purpose by the Board;

To insure the payment of service charges with respect to the telephone, electric and water systems of the University Enterprises, as the same shall become due and payable, the Board may, in addition to any other remedies which it may have:

Require reasonable advance deposits to be made with it to be subject to application to the payment of delinquent service charges, and

At the expiration of 30 days after any such service charges become delinquent, discontinue supplying the services and facilities of such telephone, electric and water systems.

To retain and employ consultants and other persons on a contract basis for rendering professional, technical or financial assistance and advice in undertaking and carrying out any project and in operating, repairing or maintaining any project or any system, facility, plant, works, instrumentalities or properties whose revenues are pledged in whole or in part for the payment of the bonds; and

To enter into and carry out contracts with the United States of America or this State or any municipality, county or other public corporation and to lease property to or from any person, firm or corporation, private or public, in connection with exercising the powers vested under this Part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to policies established by the Board of Governors, to purchase or finance the purchase of computers, computer hardware, computer software, and emergency management equipment such as power generators through lease purchase or installment purchase contracts that create a security interest in the purchased property that secures payment of the purchase price to the seller or entity advancing monies or supplying financing for the purchase transaction. The contracts allowed in this subdivision shall be subject to State appropriations in accordance with the North Carolina State Constitution and shall not pledge directly or indirectly the taxing power of the State. No deficiency judgment may be rendered against the Board of Governors or the State in any action for breach of a contractual obligation authorized by this subdivision.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 2; 1971, c. 634, s. 2; c. 636; c. 1244, s. 15; 2019-139, s. 2.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-139, s. 2.2, effective July 19, 2019, added subdivision (10).

§ 116-41.3.
University authorized to pay service charges; payments deemed revenues.

The University is hereby authorized to pay service charges for, or for the right to, the use, occupancy, services or commodities of or furnished by any project or by any other service or auxiliary facility of the University, including the University Enterprises, and the income and receipts derive from such service charges paid by the University shall be deemed to be revenues under the provisions of this Part and shall be applied and accounted for in the same manner as other revenues.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 3.

§ 116-41.4.
Bonds authorized; amount limited; form, execution and sale; terms and conditions; use of proceeds; additional bonds; interim receipts or temporary bonds; replacement of lost, etc., bonds; approval or consent for issuance; bonds not debt of State; bond anticipation notes.

The Board is hereby authorized to issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, revenue bonds of the University for the purpose of undertaking and carrying out any project or projects hereunder; provided, however, that the aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds which the Board is authorized to issue under this section during the biennium ending June 30, 1969, shall not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000); provided, further, the Board shall have authority to issue revenue bonds under this section in an additional aggregate principal amount not to exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) during the biennium ending June 30, 1971; provided, however, that the aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds which the Board is authorized to issue under this section during the biennium ending June 30, 1973, shall not exceed thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000); provided, further, that the aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds which the Board is authorized to issue under this section during the biennium ending June 30, 1975, shall not exceed thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000). The bonds shall be dated, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 30 years from their date or dates, and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Board, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the Board at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the bonds. The Board shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds, and any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Part or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this Part, all such bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form or both, as the Board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The Board may sell such bonds in such manner, at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine to be for the best interests of the University.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purpose for which such bonds shall have been authorized and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. Unless otherwise provided in the authorizing resolution, if the proceeds of such bonds, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such costs, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit and shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose.

The resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds may also contain such limitations upon the issuance of additional revenue bonds as the Board may deem proper, and such additional bonds shall be issued under such restrictions and limitations as may be prescribed by such resolution.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Board may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost.

Bonds may be issued by the Board under the provisions of this Part, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, but without obtaining the consent of any other commission, board, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those consents, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Part.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of North Carolina or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor and a statement to that effect shall be recited on the face of the bonds.

The Board is hereby authorized to issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, revenue bond anticipation notes of the Board in anticipation of the issuance of bonds authorized pursuant to the provisions of this Part. The principal of and the interest on such notes shall be payable solely from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, any available revenues of the project or projects for which such bonds shall have been authorized. The notes of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding two years from their date or dates, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Board, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the notes. The Board shall determine the form and manner of execution of the notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the notes and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer, whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any notes or coupons, shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such notes, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Part or any recitals in any notes issued under the provisions of this Part, all such notes shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State. The notes may be issued in coupon or registered form or both, as the Board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon notes of any notes registered as to both principal and interest. The Board may sell such notes in such manner, at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine to be for the best interests of the University.

The proceeds of the notes of each issue shall be used solely for the purpose for which the bonds in anticipation of which such notes are being issued shall have been authorized, and such note proceeds shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such notes or bonds.

The resolution providing for the issuance of notes or bonds may also contain such limitations upon the issuance of additional notes as the Board may deem proper, and such additional notes shall be issued under such restrictions and limitations as may be prescribed by such resolution.

Notes may be issued by the Board under the provisions of this Part, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, but without obtaining the consent of any other commission, board, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those consents, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Part.

Revenue bond anticipation notes issued under the provisions of this Part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of North Carolina or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State, but such notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor and a statement to that effect shall be recited on the face of the notes.

Unless the context shall otherwise indicate, the word “bonds,” wherever used in this Part, shall be deemed and construed to include the words “bond anticipation notes.”

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 4; 1963, c. 944, s. 2; 1965, c. 1033, s. 2; 1967, c. 724; 1969, c. 1236; 1971, c. 636; c. 1244, s. 15; 1973, c. 663; 1983, c. 577, s. 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 32, 33; 2006-203, s. 48.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 48, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “Prior to taking any action under this section, the Director of the Budget may consult with the Advisory Budget Commission.”

§ 116-41.5.
Contents of resolution authorizing issuance; powers liberally construed; deposit and use of revenues; rights and remedies of bondholders; service charges; insurance of projects; depositaries.

The Board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this Part may provide for a pledge to the payment of such revenue bonds and the interest thereon of the revenue derived from the project and also for a pledge of the revenues derived from any system, facility, plant, works, instrumentalities or properties improved, bettered, or extended by the project or otherwise within the jurisdiction of or operated by the University in connection with the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, North Carolina, the revenues derived from any future improvements, betterments or extensions of the project, the revenues derived from the University Enterprises, or any part thereof, or the revenues from the project and any or all of the revenues mentioned in this sentence, without regard to whether the operations involved are deemed governmental or proprietary, it being the purpose hereof to vest in the Board broad powers which shall be liberally construed. So long as any revenues of the University mentioned in this paragraph are pledged for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds issued hereunder, such revenues shall be deposited in a special fund and shall be applied and used only as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds, subject, however, to any prior pledge or encumbrance thereof.

The resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds, including covenants setting forth the duties of the University in relation to the construction of any project to be financed with the proceeds of said bonds, and to the maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of such project or any other project, systems, facilities, plants, works, instrumentalities, properties, the University Enterprises or any part thereof, if the revenues thereof are in any way pledged as security for the bonds; the fixing and revising of service charges and the collection thereof; and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys of the University pertaining to the project and the bonds, and all revenues pledged therefor. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the Board may carry insurance on any such project in such amounts and covering such risks as it may deem advisable. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State of North Carolina which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Board. Such resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. Such resolution may contain such other provisions in addition to the foregoing as the Board may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

The Board may provide for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and any revenues pledged therefor to such officer, board or depositary as it may designate for the custody thereof, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of operation.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 5; 1971, c. 1244, s. 15.

§ 116-41.6.
Pledge of revenues; lien.

All pledges of revenues under the provisions of this Part shall be valid and binding from the time such pledges are made. All such revenues so pledged shall immediately upon receipt thereof be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further action, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the University, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 6.

§ 116-41.7.
Proceeds of bonds, revenues, etc., deemed trust funds.

The proceeds of all bonds issued and all revenues and other moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Part shall be deemed to be trust funds, to be held and applied solely as provided in this Part. The resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds shall provide that any officer to whom, or bank, trust company or fiscal agent to which, such moneys shall be paid shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as such resolution may provide.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 7.

§ 116-41.8.
Rights and remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Part or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, except to the extent that the rights herein given may be restricted by the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of North Carolina, including this Part, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Part or by such resolution to be performed by the University or by any officer thereof or the Board, including the fixing, charging and collecting of service charges.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 8; 1971, c. 1244, s. 15.

§ 116-41.9.
Refunding revenue bonds.

The University is hereby authorized, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, to issue from time to time refunding revenue bonds for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued by the University under this Part in connection with any project or projects, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The University is further authorized, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, to issue from time to time refunding revenue bonds for the combined purpose of

Refunding any revenue bonds or refunding revenue bonds issued by the University in connection with any project or projects including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and

Paying all or any part of the cost of any project or projects.

The issuance of such refunding revenue bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights and remedies of the holders thereof, and the rights, powers, privileges, duties and obligations of the University with respect to the same, shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this Part insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 9; 1983, c. 577, s. 4; 1985 (Reg. Sess.,1986), c. 955, ss. 34, 35; 2006-203, s. 49.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 49, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “Prior to taking any action under this section, the Director of the Budget may consult with the Advisory Budget Commission.”

§ 116-41.10.
Exemption from taxation.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this Part and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation within the State.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 10.

§ 116-41.11.
Executive committee may be authorized to exercise powers and functions of Board.

The Board by resolution may authorize its executive committee to exercise or perform any of the powers or functions vested in the Board under this Part.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 11; 1971, c. 1244, s. 15.

§ 116-41.12.
Part provides supplemental and additional powers; compliance with other laws not required.

This Part shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of or as repealing any powers now existing under any other law, either general, special or local; provided, however, that the issuance of revenue bonds or refunding revenue bonds under the provisions of this Part need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds and provided, further, that all general, special or local laws, or parts thereof, inconsistent herewith are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this Part.

History.

1961, c. 1078, s. 12.

Part 4A. Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund.

§ 116-41.13.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; purpose.

The General Assembly of North Carolina recognizes that the public university system would be greatly strengthened by the addition of distinguished scholars. It further recognizes that private as well as State support is preferred in helping to obtain distinguished scholars for the State universities and that private support will help strengthen the commitment of citizens and organizations in promoting excellence throughout all State universities. It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a trust fund to provide the opportunity to each State university to receive and match challenge grants to create endowments for selected distinguished professors to occupy chairs within the university. The associated foundations that serve the universities shall solicit and receive gifts from private sources to provide for matching funds to the trust fund challenge grants for the establishment of endowments for chairs within universities.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202.

§ 116-41.13A.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

“Focused growth institution” means Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical University, North Carolina Central University, The University of North Carolina at Pembroke, Western Carolina University, and Winston-Salem State University.

“Special needs institution” means the North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” and The University of North Carolina at Asheville.

History.

2003-293, s. 1; 2008-192, s. 6.

§ 116-41.14.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; establishment; maintenance.

There is established a Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund to be maintained by the Board to provide challenge grants to the constituent institutions. All appropriated funds deposited into the trust fund shall be invested pursuant to

G.S. 116-36

. Interest income accruing to that portion of the trust fund not matched shall increase the total funds available for challenge grants.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202.

§ 116-41.15.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; allocation; administration.

For constituent institutions other than focused growth institutions and special needs institutions, the amount appropriated to the trust shall be allocated by the Board as follows:

On the basis of one three hundred thirty-four thousand dollar ($334,000) challenge grant for each six hundred sixty-six thousand dollars ($666,000) raised from private sources; or

On the basis of one one hundred sixty-seven thousand dollar ($167,000) challenge grant for each three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($333,000) raised from private sources; or

On the basis of one challenge grant of up to six hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars ($667,000) for funds raised from private sources in twice the amount of the challenge grant.If an institution chooses to pursue the use of the allocated challenge grant funds described in either subdivision (1), subdivision (2), or subdivision (3) of this subsection, the challenge grant funds shall be matched by funds from private sources on the basis of two dollars of private funds for every one dollar of State funds.

For focused growth institutions and special needs institutions, the amount appropriated to the trust shall be allocated by the Board as follows:

On the basis of one five hundred thousand dollar ($500,000) challenge grant for each five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) raised from private sources; or

On the basis of one two hundred fifty thousand dollar ($250,000) challenge grant for each two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) raised from private sources; or

On the basis of one challenge grant of up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) for funds raised from private sources in the same amount as the challenge grant.If an institution chooses to pursue the use of the allocated challenge grant funds described in either subdivision (1), subdivision (2), or subdivision (3) of this subsection, the challenge grant funds shall be matched by funds from private sources on the basis of one dollar of private funds for every dollar of State funds.

Matching funds shall come from contributions made after July 1, 1985, and pledged for the purposes specified by

G.S. 116-41.14

. Each participating constituent institution’s board of trustees shall establish its own Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund, and shall maintain it pursuant to the provision of

G.S. 116-36

to function as a depository for private contributions and for the State matching funds for the challenge grants. The State matching funds shall be transferred to the constituent institution’s Endowment Fund upon notification that the institution has received and deposited the appropriate amount required by this section in its own Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund. Only the net income from that account shall be expended in support of the distinguished professorship thereby created.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202; 2003-293, s. 2; 2005-276, s. 9.21(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 9.21(a), effective July 1, 2005, in subdivision (a)(2), inserted “one” preceding “one hundred”; added subdivisions (a)(3) and (b)(3); rewrote the undesignated paragraphs of subsections (a) and (b); and made minor punctuation changes.

§ 116-41.16.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; contribution commitments.

For constituent institutions other than focused growth institutions and special needs institutions, contributions may also be eligible for matching if there is:

A commitment to make a donation of at least six hundred sixty-six thousand dollars ($666,000), as prescribed by

G.S. 143C-4-5

, and an initial payment of one hundred eleven thousand dollars ($111,000) to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(1); or

A commitment to make a donation of at least three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($333,000), as prescribed by

G.S. 143C-4-5

, and an initial payment of fifty-five thousand five hundred dollars ($55,500) to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(2); or

A commitment to make a donation in excess of six hundred sixty-six thousand dollars ($666,000), as prescribed by G.S. 143-31.4 [G.S. 143C-4-5], and an initial payment of one-sixth of the committed amount to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(3); and if the initial payment is accompanied by a written pledge to provide the balance within five years after the date of the initial payment. Each payment on the balance shall be no less than the amount of the initial payment and shall be made on or before the anniversary date of the initial payment. Pledged contributions may not be matched prior to the actual collection of the total funds. Once the income from the institution’s Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund can be effectively used pursuant to

G.S. 116-41.17

, the institution shall proceed to implement plans for establishing an endowed chair.

For focused growth institutions and special needs institutions, contributions may also be eligible for matching if there is:

A commitment to make a donation of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), as prescribed by

G.S. 143C-4-5

, and an initial payment of eighty-three thousand three hundred dollars ($83,300) to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.5(b)(1); or

A commitment to make a donation of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), as prescribed by

G.S. 143C-4-5

, and an initial payment of forty-one thousand six hundred dollars ($41,600) to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.15(b)(2); or

A commitment to make a donation in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), as prescribed by G.S. 143-31.4 [G.S. 143C-4-5], and an initial payment of one-sixth of the committed amount to receive a grant described in G.S. 116-41.15(b)(3);

and if the initial payment is accompanied by a written pledge to provide the balance within five years after the date of the initial payment. Each payment on the balance shall be no less than the amount of the initial payment. Pledged contributions may not be matched prior to the actual collection of the total funds. Once the income from the institution’s Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund can be effectively used pursuant to

G.S. 116-41.17

, the institution shall proceed to implement plans for establishing an endowed chair.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202; 2003-293, s. 3; 2005-276, s. 9.21(b); 2006-203, s. 50.

§ 116-41.17.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; establishment of chairs.

When the sum of the challenge grant and matching funds in the Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund reaches:

One million dollars ($1,000,000), if the sum of funds described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(1) or G.S. 116-41.15(b)(1); or

Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), if the sum of funds described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(2) or G.S. 116-41.15(b)(2); or

An amount up to two million dollars ($2,000,000), if the sum of funds described in G.S. 116-41.15(a)(3) or G.S. 116-41.15(b)(3);

the board of trustees may recommend to the Board, for its approval, the establishment of an endowed chair or chairs. The Board, in considering whether to approve the recommendation, shall include in its consideration the programs already existing in The University of North Carolina. If the Board approves the recommendation, the chair or chairs shall be established. The chair or chairs, the property of the constituent institution, may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of the board of trustees.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202; 2005-276, s. 9.21(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 9.21(c), effective July 1, 2005, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “Distinguished Professors” for “Scholars’ ”; in subdivision (1), substituted “G.S. 116-41.15(a)(1) or G.S. 116-41.15(b)(1)” for “G.S. 116-41.15(1)”; in subdivision (2), substituted “G.S.
116-41.15(a)(2) or G.S. 116-41.15(b)(2); or” for “G.S. 116-41.15(2);”; and added subdivision (3).

§ 116-41.18.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; selection of Distinguished Professors.

Each constituent institution that receives, through private gifts and an allocation by the Board of Governors, funds for the purpose shall, under procedures established by rules of the Board of Governors and the board of trustees of the constituent institution, select a holder of the Distinguished Professorship. Once given, that designation shall be retained by the distinguished professor as long as he remains in the full-time service of the institution as a faculty member, or for more limited lengths of time when authorized by the Board of Governors and the board of trustees at the institution when the Distinguished Professorship is originally established or vacated. When a distinguished professorship becomes vacant, it shall remain assigned to the institution and another distinguished professor shall be selected under procedures established by rules of the Board of Governors and the board of trustees of the constituent institution.

(a1)

No rule shall prevent the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina from selecting holders of Distinguished Professorships from among existing faculty members or newly hired faculty members.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for fiscal year 1985-86, and the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for fiscal year 1986-87, to implement this section.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 31; 1995, c. 507, s. 15.12; 1997-443, s. 10.6.

§ 116-41.19.
Distinguished Professors Endowment Trust Fund; promulgation of rules.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall promulgate rules to implement this Part.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 202.

§§ 116-41.20 through 116-41.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4B. Future Teachers of North Carolina.

§ 116-41.30.
Establishment of Future Teachers of North Carolina.

Purpose. — Future Teachers of North Carolina, hereinafter FTNC, is established to encourage high-achieving high school students with strong academic, interpersonal, and leadership skills to consider teaching as a career.

Program. — FTNC shall be a selective, application-based symposium for high school juniors and seniors, offering a challenging introduction to teaching as a profession. FTNC courses shall provide instruction on pedagogy, ethics and professionalism, child development, successful teaching strategies and classroom management practices, effective lesson planning, assessment and intervention, and requirements of teacher licensure. The FTNC Symposium should provide practical benefits to participating students, which may include interaction with current educators, administrators, and educator preparation program faculty members; a simulated student teaching experience; and information about financial aid and scholarship opportunities.

History.

2017-57, s. 10.9(a); 2020-56, s. 4(a).

§ 116-41.31.
Oversight of Future Teachers of North Carolina.

FTNC System Office. — FTNC shall be administratively located in The University of North Carolina System Office. The President shall establish a Future Teachers of North Carolina Advisory Council (FTNC Council) to oversee the FTNC program. At the President’s discretion, the FTNC Council shall coordinate with constituent institutions to utilize expertise from administrators, faculty, and staff members of institutions of higher education in designing the agenda and instructional content for the FTNC Symposium. The FTNC Council shall ensure diverse representation of the educator preparation programs represented at the FTNC Symposium. The FTNC Council shall also be responsible for creating an application process for interested high school students, reviewing submitted applications, selecting students to attend, and recruitment and outreach efforts.

, (c) Repealed by Session Laws 2020-56, s. 4(b), effective June 30, 2020.

History.

2017-57, s. 10.9(a); 2018-12, s. 6; 2020-56, s. 4(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-12, s. 6, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “System Office” for “General Administration” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2020-56, s. 4(b), effective June 30, 2020, rewrote the section.

§ 116-41.32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-80, s. 2.4(b), effective July 8, 2021.

History.

2017-57, s. 10.9(a); 2018-12, s. 7; 2020-56, s. 4(c); repealed by 2021-80, s. 2.4(b), effective July 8, 2021.

§§ 116-42 through 116-42.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 495, s. 2.

§ 116-43.
Escheat receipts prior to July 1, 1971.

All property that has heretofore escheated to the University of North Carolina, and all interest and earnings thereon, shall be set apart by the Board of Governors of the University for the six member campuses of the University of North Carolina as constituted on June 30, 1971, so that the interest and earnings from said fund shall be used for maintenance and/or for scholarships and loan funds for worthy and needy students, residents of the State, attending the member campuses of the University of North Carolina as constituted on June 30, 1971, under such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the Board of Governors.

History.

1874-5, c. 236, s. 2; Code, s. 2630; Rev., s. 4285; C.S., s. 5787; 1947, c. 614, s. 4; 1953, c. 1202, s. 3; 1971, c. 1244, s. 17.